Nebraska, session 109, LB394.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB394 LB394
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 89-186, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
89-186 (1) The Legislature hereby adopts by reference the following:
(a) The standards of the National Conference on Weights and Measures
published in National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 44
entitled Specifications, Tolerances, and Other Technical Requirements for
Weighing and Measuring Devices as it existed on January 1, 2025 2019,
except Section 3.31. Vehicle - Tank meters. UR.2.2. Ticket Printer,
Customer Ticket, Section 2.20. Scales, N.3. Minimum Test Weights and Test
Loads; and Table 4, are not adopted. In addition to the language found in
Section 3.30. Liquid-Measuring Devices, S.1.6.4., S.1.6.5., UR.3.2., and
UR.3.3. of such handbook, any computing device in which a product or
grade is offered for sale at more than one unit price may also compute at
the lowest possible unit price for such transaction. All prices shall
still be displayed or posted on the face of the dispenser. Such handbook
shall govern all commercial and law enforcement weighing and measuring
devices in the state;
(b) The Uniform Regulation for the Method of Sale of Commodities of
the National Conference on Weights and Measures published in National
Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130 entitled Uniform Laws
and Regulations in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Engine Fuel Quality
as it existed on January 1, 2025 2019. Such handbook shall be used to
determine the proper units of measurement to be used in the keeping for
sale or sale of commodities;
(c) The Uniform Packaging and Labeling Regulation of the National
Conference on Weights and Measures published in National Institute of
Standards and Technology Handbook 130 entitled Uniform Laws and
Regulations in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Engine Fuel Quality as it
existed on January 1, 2025 2019. Such handbook shall govern the packaging
and labeling by weight, measure, or count of commodities kept for sale or
sold in this state; and
-2-

LB394 LB394
2025 2025
(d) The procedures designated in National Institute of Standards and
Technology Handbook 133 entitled Checking the Net Contents of Packaged
Goods as it existed on January 1, 2025 2019.
(2) Copies of the handbooks adopted by reference in this section
shall be filed with the Secretary of State, Clerk of the Legislature, and
Department of Agriculture. Copies filed with the Clerk of the Legislature
shall be filed electronically.
(3) Whenever there exists an inconsistency between the provisions of
the Weights and Measures Act other than this section and any of the
handbooks adopted by reference, the requirements of such provisions of
the act shall control.
Sec. 2. Section 89-187, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
89-187 For purposes of administering and enforcing the Weights and
Measures Act, the director is authorized to:
(1) Maintain traceability of the primary standards to the National
Institute of Standards and Technology;
(2) Enforce the provisions of the Weights and Measures Act;
(3) Adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for the
enforcement of the act including the following:
(a) Requirements for the voluntary registration of sales and repair
personnel for commercial weighing and measuring devices including:
(i) Registration fees for such personnel which shall not exceed the
actual cost to defray the operation of the voluntary registration
program;
(ii)(A) Qualifications for registration, which may include
examinations, (B) performance standards to maintain registration, (C)
types of equipment necessary for the work to be performed by the
personnel, (D) responsibilities and privileges of registration, and (E)
revocation and suspension of such registration and probation of the
registrant; and
-3-

LB394 LB394
2025 2025
(iii) Minimum standards for the installation and maintenance of
commercial weighing and measuring devices;
(b) Additional standards not specifically provided for in the act;
(c) Standards for (i) attachments or parts entering into the
construction or installation of commercial weighing and measuring devices
which shall tend to secure correct results in the use of such devices and
(ii) the setting of laboratory fees which shall not exceed the actual
cost for testing, correcting, calibrating, and verifying secondary
standards and the establishment of standard laboratory operating
procedures;
(d) Requirements for the suitable use of commercial weighing and
measuring devices; and
(e) Guidelines for the appropriate method of weighing or measuring
whenever the director determines that such guidelines would further the
purpose of the act;
(4) Establish standards of weight, measure, or count, reasonable
standards of fill, and standards for the presentation of cost-per-unit
information for any commodity;
(5) Upon an application filed with the department by the applicant,
grant exemptions, including specific exemptions for single-use commercial
weighing and measuring devices, from the provisions of the act or the
rules and regulations when the applicant on such application provides
assurances, acceptable to the director, that such exemption is
appropriate to the maintenance of good commercial practices within the
state. Notwithstanding any other provision of the act, meters used by a
public utility system for the measurement of electricity, natural or
manufactured gas, water, or the usage of communication services, the
appliances or accessories associated with such meters, and all weighing
and measuring devices inspected or tested by the Public Service
Commission shall be exempt from the registration, inspection, and testing
requirements of the act, except that this exemption shall not apply to
-4-

LB394 LB394
2025 2025
meters which determine the weight or measurement of motor fuel;
(6) Conduct investigations to insure compliance with the act;
(7) Delegate to appropriate personnel any of these responsibilities
for the proper administration of the director's office;
(8) In his or her discretion, inspect and test weighing and
measuring devices kept for sale or sold;
(9) Inspect and test annually and from time to time, as in the
director's judgment seems necessary, to ascertain whether commercial
weighing and measuring devices are correct;
(10) Register and test as far as practical all commercial weighing
and measuring devices used in checking the receipt or disbursement of
supplies in every institution for which funds are appropriated by the
Legislature;
(11) Test annually and at the request of the Nebraska State Patrol
all weighing and measuring devices used for the enforcement of sections
60-3,144, 60-3,147, and 60-6,294. The agency responsible for such
weighing and measuring devices shall pay the department for the actual
cost of such tests. The department shall bill test fees to such agency
upon completion of the test;
(12) Approve for use and may mark commercial weighing and measuring
devices which the director finds to be correct and shall reject and mark
or tag as rejected such commercial weighing and measuring devices which
the director finds to be not correct or not registered and inspected in
accordance with the Weights and Measures Act. Commercial weighing and
measuring devices that have been rejected may be seized if not made
correct within the time specified or if used or disposed of in a manner
not specifically authorized. The director shall condemn and may seize
commercial weighing and measuring devices which are found not to be
correct and not capable of being made correct;
(13) Weigh, measure, or inspect commodities kept for sale, sold, or
in the process of delivery to determine whether they contain the amounts
-5-

LB394 LB394
2025 2025
represented and whether they are kept for sale or sold in accordance with
the act or the rules and regulations. When commodities are found not to
contain the amounts represented or are found to be kept for sale, sold,
or in the process of delivery in violation of the act, the director may
issue stop-sale, hold, or removal orders and may mark or tag such
commodities as being in violation of the act. In carrying out the
provisions of this section, the director shall employ recognized
procedures pursuant to subdivisions (1)(b) through (d) of section 89-186;
(14) Provide for the weights and measures training of inspection
personnel and adopt and promulgate by rule and regulation minimum
training requirements which shall be met by all inspection personnel;
(15) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations prescribing the
appropriate term or unit of measurement to be used whenever the director
determines in the case of a specific commodity that an existing practice
of declaring the quantity by weight, measure, numerical count, or
combination thereof does not facilitate value comparisons by consumers or
offers an opportunity for consumer confusion;
(16) Allow reasonable variations from the stated quantity of
contents which shall include those caused by loss or gain of moisture
during the course of good distribution practice or by unavoidable
deviations in good manufacturing practice only after the commodity has
entered intrastate commerce;
(17) Verify advertised prices, price representations, and point-of-
sale systems, as deemed necessary, to determine: (a) The accuracy of
prices, quantity, and computations; (b) the correct use of the equipment;
and (c) if such systems utilize scanning or coding means in lieu of
manual entry, the accuracy of prices and quantity printed or recalled
from a database;
(18) On or before July 1 of each year, notify all persons who have
registered any commercial weighing or measuring device of the amount of
fees which are due and that the fees are due on August 1 and shall be
-6-

LB394 LB394
2025 2025
delinquent after such date;
(19) Require all persons who operate a weighing and measuring
establishment to obtain a permit to operate such establishment pursuant
to section 89-187.01 and to pay to the department an application permit
fee pursuant to section 89-187.02;
(20) Require all persons who operate a weighing and measuring
establishment to, on or before August 1 of each year:
(a) Register each commercial weighing and measuring device with the
department upon forms furnished by the director;
(b) Pay to the department a registration fee of four dollars; and
(c) Pay to the department a device inspection fee.
(i) The device inspection fee shall be due each August 1 and shall
be set by the director on or before July 1 of each year. The director may
raise or lower the device inspection fees each year to meet the criteria
in this subdivision, but the fee shall not be greater than the amount in
column B of subdivision (20)(c)(ii) of this section. The same percentage
shall be applied to each device category for all device inspection fee
increases or decreases to the nearest dollar. The director shall use the
amounts in column A of subdivision (20)(c)(ii) of this section as a base
for future fee increases or decreases. The director shall determine the
fees based on estimated annual revenue and fiscal year-end cash fund
balances as follows:
(A) The estimated annual revenue shall not be greater than one
hundred seven percent of program cash fund appropriations allocated for
the Weights and Measures Act; and
(B) The estimated fiscal year-end cash fund balance shall not be
greater than seventeen percent of program cash fund appropriations
allocated for the act.
(ii)
Scales: A B
Up through 35 pounds capacity 37.00 43.00
-7-

LB394 LB394
2025 2025
Up through 35 pounds capacity 7.96 14.34
Multiunit Scales 169.00 196.00
Multiunit Scales 51.00 80.37
Over 35 through 1,000 pounds capacity 59.00 68.00
Over 35 through 1,000 pounds capacity 15.13 25.35
Over 1,000 through 4,000 pounds capacity 110.00 127.00
Over 1,000 through 4,000 pounds capacity 31.87 51.03
Over 4,000 through 50,000 pounds capacity 125.00 144.00
Over 4,000 through 50,000 pounds capacity 36.65 58.36
Over 50,000 through 150,000 pounds capacity 132.00 153.00
Over 50,000 through 150,000 pounds capacity 39.04 62.03
Over 150,000 pounds capacity 279.00 323.00
Over 150,000 pounds capacity 86.87 135.40
Length Measuring Devices:
Cordage or fabric 63.00 73.00
Cordage or fabric 16.56 27.55
Pumps:
Service Station Dispensers—per
measuring element 28.00 32.00
measuring element 5.09 9.94
High-capacity service station
dispensers over 20 gallons per
minute—per dispensing element 66.00 77.00
minute—per dispensing element 17.52 29.02
Compressed natural gas—per
dispensing element 294.00 340.00
dispensing element 91.65 142.74
Meters:
Vehicle tank meters 56.00 65.00
Vehicle tank meters 14.17 23.88
-8-

LB394 LB394
2025 2025
Loading rack meters 110.00 128.00
Loading rack meters 31.87 51.03
Liquid petroleum gas meters 135.00 157.00
Liquid petroleum gas meters 40.00 63.50
Liquid fertilizer and herbicide meters 125.00 145.00
Liquid fertilizer and herbicide meters 36.65 58.36
Liquid feed meters 125.00 145.00
Liquid feed meters 36.65 58.36
Cryogenic 176.00 204.00
Cryogenic 53.39 84.04
Mass Flow Metering Systems:
Mass flow meters (all liquid) 252.00 293.00
Mass flow meters (all liquid) 78.26 122.19;
Electric vehicle chargers 294.00 340.00;
and
(21) Require persons delinquent under subdivision (20) of this
section to pay an administrative fee of fifty twenty-five percent of the
annual fees due for each month any such fees are delinquent not to exceed
one hundred percent of such fees. Such administrative fees paid shall be
in addition to the annual fees due. The purpose of the additional
administrative fee is to cover the administrative costs associated with
collecting fees. All money collected as an additional administrative fee
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Weights and
Measures Administrative Fund. If any fee remains unpaid at the end of the
ninetieth day after the original due date for such fee, the weighing and
measuring establishment permit relating to such fee is void.
Sec. 3. Section 89-187.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
89-187.02 Application for a permit to operate a weighing and
measuring establishment shall be made to the director on forms prescribed
and furnished by the department. Such application shall include the full
-9-

LB394 LB394
2025 2025
name and mailing address of the applicant; the names and addresses of any
partners, members, or corporate officers; the name and address of the
person authorized by the applicant to receive notices and orders of the
department as provided in the Weights and Measures Act; whether the
applicant is an individual, partnership, limited liability company,
corporation, or other legal entity; and the location and type of all
commercial weighing and measuring devices. An application for a permit
shall be made prior to the operation of a weighing and measuring
establishment. The application shall be accompanied by a one-time permit
fee of five dollars and the annual device registration and device
inspection fees required in section 89-187. The full annual device
registration and device inspection fees are required regardless of when
during the year the device is put into operation.
Sec. 4. Section 89-187.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
89-187.05 (1) A weighing and measuring establishment which has a
permanent location for commercial weighing and measuring devices shall
have a valid permit posted in a conspicuous place at the establishment,
and there shall not be a change in ownership, location, or business name
without the permitholder obtaining a new permit. Any permit for such
establishment shall lapse automatically upon a change of ownership,
location, or business name.
(2) A weighing and measuring establishment which does not have a
permanent location for commercial weighing and measuring devices shall
have a copy of a valid permit posted on or about each device and shall
not have a change in ownership, business name, or permanent mailing
address without the permitholder obtaining a new permit. Any permit for
such establishment shall lapse automatically upon a change of ownership,
business name, or permanent mailing address.
(3) The holder of any weighing and measuring establishment permit
shall notify the department in writing at least thirty days prior to any
-10-

LB394 LB394
2025 2025
change requiring a new permit under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section. A permitholder shall notify the department in writing before
there is a change of the name or address of the person authorized to
receive notices and orders of the department. When an establishment is to
be permanently closed, the permitholder shall return the permit to the
department within one week after the closing.
Sec. 5. Original sections 89-186, 89-187, 89-187.02, and 89-187.05,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-11-